District of Columbia statutes.
32-411

Powers of Mayor as to witnesses.

(a)

The Mayor, in the performance of any duty or the execution of any power prescribed by this chapter, may administer oaths or affirmations, certify official acts, take and cause to be taken depositions of witnesses, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, documents, records, and testimony.

(b)

In case of failure of any person to comply with a lawful subpoena or of the refusal of any witness to produce evidence or to testify to any matter about which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, upon the application of the Mayor or the Mayor’s designee, may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt.

History

Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-136, § 12, 31 DCR 5727

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1011.